Louisiana, session 2026, SB238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:2121 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2121. Tax sale held prior to January 1, 2026; applicability procedures
A.(1) All delinquent statutory impositions for which tax sale title was not
sold prior to January 1, 2026, shall be subject to the collection procedures set
forth in this Chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
if, prior to January 1, 2026, a tax collector has provided notice to all tax notice
parties, notice of statutory impositions due in accordance with the law in effect
at the time the statutory impositions were assessed, this notice shall be deemed
sufficient to satisfy the requirements of R.S. 47:2127(E), provided that all steps
taken toward the collection of the statutory impositions after December 31,
2025, comply with the provisions of this Chapter, including the use of the tax
lien auction procedures set forth in R.S. 47:2154.
B. For tax sales held prior to January 1, 2026, the rights of the tax sale
purchaser, or his successors or assigns, shall be subject to the notice and
enforcement procedures provided for in the law in effect at the time of the tax
sale.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 238 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.